Hawaii statutes.
[§844D-102] Authority under other laws not
affected. (a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict the
authority of local law enforcement to maintain its own DNA-related databases or
data banks, or to restrict the department with respect to data banks and
databases created by other statutory authority, including but not limited to
databases related to fingerprints, firearms and other weapons, child abuse,
domestic violence deaths, child deaths, driving offenses, missing persons, sex
offender registration, and criminal justice statistics.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed
to limit the authority of the medical examiner of the city and county of
Honolulu or county coroners or their agents, in the course of their scientific
investigation, to use genetic and DNA technology to inquire into and determine
the circumstances, manner, and cause of death, or to employ or use outside
laboratories, hospitals, or research institutions that use genetic and DNA
technology. [L 2005, c 112, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next